Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Chapter 17 Wyoming Lottery
§
9-17-117.
Cancellation, suspension, revocation or termination of retail contracts.

Any retail contract executed by the corporation pursuant to this chapter shall specify the reasons for which a contract may be cancelled, suspended, revoked or terminated by the corporation.

History.

2013 ch. 200, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

§
9-17-118.
Restrictions on sale of tickets or shares; price; gifts and promotions.

No person shall sell a ticket or share at a price other than established by the corporation unless authorized in writing by the chief executive officer. No person other than a duly certified lottery retailer shall sell lottery tickets, but this subsection shall not be construed to prevent a person who may lawfully purchase tickets or shares from making a gift of lottery tickets or shares to another. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the corporation from designating certain of its agents and employees to sell or give lottery tickets or shares directly to the public.

No lottery retailer shall sell a lottery ticket or share except from the locations listed in his contract and as evidenced by his certificate of authorization unless the corporation authorizes in writing any temporary location not listed in his contract.

No lottery tickets or shares shall be sold to persons under eighteen (18) years of age, but this subsection does not prohibit the purchase of a lottery ticket or share by a person eighteen (18) years of age or older for the purpose of making a gift to any person of any age. In that case, the corporation shall direct payment of proceeds of any lottery prize to an adult member of the person’s family or a legal representative of the person on behalf of the underage person.

History.

2013 ch. 200, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Cited in

Cloud v. State, 2014 WY 113,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Sept. 10, 2014).

§
9-17-119.
Prize proceeds subject to attachments, garnishments or executions; validation of winning tickets; prohibited purchases; money dispensing machines; unclaimed prize money.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, attachments, garnishments, executions or past-due child support authorized and issued pursuant to law shall be withheld if timely served upon the corporation. This subsection shall not apply to a retailer.

The corporation shall adopt regulations, policies and procedures to establish a system of verifying the validity of tickets or shares claimed to win prizes and to effect payment of the prizes, except that:

No prize, any portion of a prize or any right of any person to a prize awarded shall be assignable. Any prize or any portion of a prize remaining unpaid at the death of a prize winner shall be paid to the estate of the deceased prize winner or to the trustee of a trust established by the deceased prize winner as settlor if a copy of the trust document or instrument has been filed with the corporation along with a notarized letter of direction from the settlor and no written notice of revocation has been received by the corporation prior to the settlor’s death. Following a settlor’s death and prior to any payment to a successor trustee, the corporation shall obtain from the trustee a written agreement to indemnify and hold the corporation harmless with respect to any claims that may be asserted against the corporation arising from payment to or through the trust. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, any person, pursuant to an appropriate judicial order, shall be paid the prize to which a winner is entitled;

No prize shall be paid arising from claimed tickets that are:

Stolen, counterfeit, altered, fraudulent, unissued, produced or issued in error, unreadable, not received or not recorded by the corporation within applicable deadlines;

Lacking in captions that conform and agree with the play symbols as appropriate to the particular lottery game involved; or

Not in compliance with any additional specific regulations and public or confidential validation and security tests of the corporation appropriate to the particular lottery game involved.

No particular prize in any lottery game shall be paid more than once, and in the event of a determination that more than one (1) claimant is entitled to a particular prize, the sole remedy of the claimants is the award to each of them of an equal share in the prize; and

A holder of a winning cash ticket or share from a lottery game shall claim a cash prize within one hundred eighty (180) days, or for a multi-state or multi-sovereign lottery game within one hundred eighty (180) days, after the drawing in which the cash prize was won. If a valid claim is not made for a cash prize within the applicable period, the cash prize shall constitute an unclaimed prize for purposes of this section.

No prize shall be paid upon a ticket or share purchased or sold in violation of this chapter. The prize shall constitute an unclaimed prize for purposes of this section.

The corporation is discharged of all liability upon payment of a prize.

No ticket or share shall be purchased by and no prize shall be paid to any member of the board of directors, any officer or employee of the corporation or to any spouse, child, brother, sister or parent residing as a member of the same household in the principal place of residence of any member of the board of directors, officer or employee of the corporation. No ticket or share shall be purchased by and no prize shall be paid to any officer, employee, agent or subcontractor of any vendor or to any spouse, child, brother, sister or parent residing as a member of the same household in the principal place of residence of any officer, employee, agent or subcontractor of any vendor if the officer, employee, agent or subcontractor has access to confidential information which may compromise the integrity of the lottery.

No lottery game utilizing an electronic or mechanical machine may use a machine which dispenses coins or currency.

Unclaimed prize money shall be used to offset prize expenses. A portion of unclaimed prize money, not to exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00) annually, shall be used by the corporation to develop, in consultation with the department of health programs for the treatment of compulsive gambling disorder and educational programs related to the disorder.

History.

2013 ch. 200, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2018 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 33, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (g), deleted “lottery” preceding “proceeds.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted "shall be used to offset prize expenses" for
"shall not constitute net proceeds" in the first sentence and deleted the last sentence which read: "In addition, unclaimed prize money may be added to the pool from which future prizes are to be awarded or used for special prize promotions."

§ 9-17-120.
Confidentiality of information; investigations; supervision and inspections; reports of suspected violations; assistance in investigation of violations.

Except as authorized in this chapter, the corporation is subject to the provisions of W.S.

16-4-201

through

16-4-205

and

16-4-401

through

16-4-408

. Confidential information is exempt from the provisions of W.S.

16-4-201

through

16-4-205

and may be discussed during executive session pursuant to W.S. 16-4-405(a). Meetings or portions of meetings devoted to discussing information deemed confidential pursuant to this subsection are exempt from W.S.

16-4-401

through

16-4-408

.

The corporation shall perform full criminal background investigations on all potential vendors prior to the execution of any vendor contract. The corporation shall be authorized to pay for the actual cost of the investigations and may contract with the division of criminal investigation for the performance of the investigations.

The corporation or its authorized agent shall:

Conduct criminal background investigations and credit investigations on all potential retailers. The corporation shall be authorized to pay for the actual cost of the investigations and may contract with the division of criminal investigation for the performance of the investigations;

Supervise ticket or share validation and lottery drawings;

Inspect at times, determined solely by the corporation, the facilities of any vendor or lottery retailer in order to determine the integrity of the vendor’s product or the operations of the retailer in order to determine whether the vendor or the retailer is in compliance with its contract;

Report any suspected violations of this chapter to the appropriate district attorney or the attorney general and to any law enforcement agencies having jurisdiction over the violation; and

Upon request, provide assistance to any district attorney, the attorney general or a law enforcement agency investigating a violation of this chapter.

History.

2013 ch. 200, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2019 ch. 33, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in the first sentence of (a) added "and

16-4-401

through

16-4-408

" and rewrote the second through fourth sentences which read: "The corporation is specifically authorized to determine which information relating to the operation of the lottery is confidential. Confidential information includes trade secrets, security measures, systems or procedures, security reports, information concerning bids or other contractual data, the disclosure of which would impair the efforts of the corporation to contract for goods or services on favorable terms, employee personnel information unrelated to compensation, duties, qualifications or responsibilities and information obtained pursuant to investigations which is otherwise confidential. Information deemed confidential pursuant to this subsection."

§
9-17-121.
Sales to minors; penalty; affirmative defense.

Any person who knowingly sells a lottery ticket or share to a person under eighteen (18) years of age or permits a person under eighteen (18) years of age to play any lottery game shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) for the first offense and for each subsequent offense not less than two hundred dollars ($200.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00). It shall be an affirmative defense to a charge of a violation under this section that the retailer reasonably and in good faith relied upon representation of proof of age in making the sale.

History.

2013 ch. 200, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

§
9-17-122.
Penalty for falsely making, altering, forging, uttering, passing or counterfeiting ticket; penalty for attempting to influence winning of prize.

Any person who, with intent to defraud, falsely makes, alters, forges, utters, passes or counterfeits a state lottery ticket is guilty of a felony and shall be punished by a fine not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00), imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or both.

Any person who influences or attempts to influence the winning of a prize through the use of coercion, fraud, deception or tampering with lottery equipment or materials is guilty of a felony and shall be punished by a fine not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00), imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or both.

History.

2013 ch. 200, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

§
9-17-123.
Penalty for making false statements or false entries in books or records.

No person shall knowingly or intentionally make a material false statement in any application for a license or proposal to conduct lottery activities or make a material false entry in any book or record which is compiled or maintained or submitted to the board pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be punished by a fine not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00) or the dollar amount of the false entry or statement, whichever is greater, by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or both.

History.

2013 ch. 200, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

§
9-17-124.
Agreements with agencies of other jurisdictions; restriction on release of records, documents and information.

The corporation may enter into intelligence sharing, reciprocal use or restricted use agreements with the federal government, law enforcement agencies, lottery regulation agencies and gaming enforcement agencies of other jurisdictions which provide for and regulate the use of information provided and received pursuant to the agreement.

Records, documents and information in the possession of the corporation received pursuant to an intelligence sharing, reciprocal use or restricted use agreement entered into by the corporation with a federal department or agency, any law enforcement agency or the lottery regulation or gaming enforcement agency of any jurisdiction shall be considered investigative records of a law enforcement agency and are not subject to W.S.

16-4-201

through

16-4-205

and shall not be released under any condition without the permission of the person or agency providing the record or information.

History.

2013 ch. 200, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

§
9-17-125.
Bidding requirements and procedures for contracts.

The corporation shall enter into its contracts for procurements after competitive bidding. The requirement for competitive bidding does not apply in the case of a single vendor having exclusive rights to offer a particular service or product. Procedures adopted by the board shall be designed to allow the selection of proposals that provide the greatest long-term benefit to the state, the greatest integrity for the corporation and the best service and products for the public.

In any bidding process, the corporation may administer its own bidding and procurement or may utilize the services of the department of administration and information or other state agency or subdivision thereof.

History.

2013 ch. 200, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

§
9-17-126.
Appeals from actions of board.

Any retailer, vendor or applicant for a retailer or vendor contract aggrieved by an action of the board may appeal that decision to the first judicial district court.

The first judicial district court shall hear appeals from decisions of the board and based upon the record of the proceedings before the board may reverse the decision of the board only if the appellant proves the decision to be:

Clearly erroneous;

Arbitrary and capricious;

Procured by fraud;

A result of substantial misconduct by the board; or

Contrary to the United States constitution or the constitution of Wyoming or the provisions of this chapter.

The district court may remand an appeal to the board to conduct further hearings.

Any person who appeals the award of a major procurement contract for the supply of a lottery ticket system, share system or an on-line or other mechanical or electronic system shall be liable for all costs of appeal and defense in the event the appeal is denied or the contract award upheld.

History.

2013 ch. 200, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

§
9-17-127.
Corporation authorized to borrow money; validation of debt; restriction on use of money in state general fund and other state funds; purchase or release of goods and services.

The corporation may borrow, or accept and expend, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, monies as may be received from any source, including income from the corporation’s operations, for effectuating its corporate purposes, including the payment of the initial expenses of initiation, administration and operation of the corporation and the lottery.

The corporation shall be self sustaining and self funded. Monies in the state general fund or any other state funds or monies in any form shall not be used or obligated to pay the expenses of the corporation or prizes of the lottery and no claim for the payment of an expense of the lottery or prizes of the lottery may be made against any monies other than monies credited to the corporation operating account.

The corporation may purchase, lease or lease purchase goods or services as necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter. The corporation may make procurements which integrate functions including lottery game design, lottery ticket distribution to retailers, supply of goods and services and advertising. In all procurement decisions, the corporation shall take into account the particularly sensitive nature of the state lottery and shall act to promote and ensure security, honesty, fairness and integrity in the operation and administration of the lottery and the objectives of raising net proceeds.

History.

2013 ch. 200, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

§
9-17-128.
Reports by corporation; audits; budget; fiscal year.

To ensure the financial integrity of the lottery, the corporation through its board of directors shall:

Submit quarterly and annual reports to the governor, department of audit and the joint revenue interim committee disclosing the total lottery revenues, prize disbursements and expenses of the corporation during the reporting period. The annual report shall additionally describe the organizational structure of the corporation and summarize the functions performed by each organizational division within the corporation;

Adopt a system of internal audits;

Maintain weekly or more frequent records of lottery transactions, including the distribution of tickets or shares to retailers, revenues received, claims for prizes, prizes paid, prizes forfeited and other financial transactions of the corporation;

Contract with a certified public accountant or firm for an annual financial audit of the corporation. The certified public accountant or firm shall have no financial interest in any vendor with whom the corporation is under contract. The certified public accountant or firm shall present an audit report not later than four (4) months after the end of the fiscal year. The certified public accountant or firm shall evaluate the internal controls in effect during the audit period. The cost of this annual financial audit shall be an operating expense of the corporation. The department of audit may at any time conduct an audit of any phase of the operations of the Wyoming lottery corporation at the expense of the state and shall receive a copy of the annual independent financial audit. A copy of any audit performed by the certified public accountant or firm or the department of audit shall be transmitted to the governor, the department of audit, the state auditor and the joint revenue interim committee;

Submit to the governor, the department of audit and the joint revenue interim committee by June 30 of each year a copy of the annual operating budget for the corporation for the next fiscal year. This annual operating budget shall be approved by the board and be on forms as prescribed by the state budget department;

For informational purposes only, submit to the governor on September 1 of each year a proposed operating budget for the corporation for the succeeding fiscal year. This budget proposal shall also be accompanied by an estimate of the net proceeds to be deposited into the lottery account during the succeeding fiscal year; and

Adopt the same fiscal year as that used by state government.

History.

2013 ch. 200, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2015 ch. 182, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2019 ch. 33, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, deleted "and the joint travel, recreation, wildlife and cultural resources interim committee" following "the joint revenue interim committee" and deleted "operating expenses" and "administrative" preceding "expenses of the corporation" in (a)(i); deleted "and the joint travel, recreation, wildlife and cultural resources interim committee" in the last sentence of (a)(iv); deleted "and the joint travel, recreation, wildlife and cultural resources interim committee" in the first sentence of (a)(v) and made a related change throughout.

The 2021 amendment,

in the second sentence of (a)(v), added "state budget" preceding "department" and deleted "of administration and information" at the end.

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.